Tennessee, session 114, HB0337.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 5, Chapter 1, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
In addition to any other duties prescribed to the county attorney by general law,
private act, or county ordinance, the county attorney shall consult with and advise
elected county officials, elected county officials' deputies, and elected county officials'
employees as to the proper application and enforcement of federal and state laws that
are pertinent to carrying out the duties of the county officials' respective offices.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 6, Chapter 54, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following language as a new, appropriately designated section:
In addition to any other duties prescribed to the city attorney by general law,
private act, or city ordinance, the city attorney shall consult with and advise elected city
officials, elected city officials' deputies, and elected city officials' employees as to the
proper application and enforcement of federal and state laws that are pertinent to
carrying out the duties of the city officials' respective offices.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0337
001932
- 1 -